Maryland, session 2026, HB0830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
9–303.
(a) The State Board shall establish guidelines for the administration of absentee
voting by the local boards.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0830*

HOUSE BILL 830
(b) The guidelines shall provide for:
(1) the application process;
(2) late application for absentee ballots;
(3) ballot security, including storage of returned ballots;
(4) determining timeliness of receipt of applications and ballots, including
applications and ballots for overseas voters;
(5) the canvass process;
(6) notice of the canvass to candidates, political parties, campaign
organizations, news media, and the general public;
(7) observers of the process;
(8) review of voted ballots and envelopes for compliance with the law and
for machine tabulation acceptability;
(9) standards for disallowance of ballots during the canvass;
(10) storage and retention of ballots following canvass and certification;
[and]
(11) the permanent absentee ballot list; AND
(12) VERIFICATION OF SIGNATURES ON ABSENTEE BALLOT
ENVELOPES.
(c) The State Board shall:
(1) in consultation with the local boards, assess the guidelines before each
primary election; and
(2) revise the guidelines if indicated.
9–310.
(a) (5) When voted and returned to the local board, an absentee ballot shall be
enclosed in a ballot envelope or ballot/return envelope, on which has been printed [an oath]
OATHS prescribed by the State Board.
(c) If an absentee ballot is sent by the Internet or facsimile transmission, the local
board shall provide the voter with an envelope template, the [oath] OATHS prescribed by

HOUSE BILL 830 3
the State Board, and instructions for marking and returning the absentee ballot.
9–310.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “UNIFORMED SERVICES” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN 10 U.S.C. § 101.
(B) A LOCAL BOARD MAY NOT REMOVE AN ABSENTEE BALLOT FROM THE
RETURN ENVELOPE OR BALLOT/RETURN ENVELOPE OR COUNT THE BALLOT
UNLESS:
(1) THE RETURN ENVELOPE OR BALLOT/RETURN ENVELOPE IS
SIGNED BY:
(I) THE VOTER TO WHOM THE BALLOT WAS ISSUED; AND
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
A WITNESS OTHER THAN THE VOTER TO WHOM THE BALLOT WAS ISSUED; AND
(2) THE VOTER’S SIGNATURE IS VERIFIED AS PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE WITNESS SIGNATURE REQUIREMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(II)
OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN ABSENTEE BALLOT THAT IS VOTED AND
RETURNED BY:
(1) AN ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES WHO IS
SERVING OVERSEAS; OR
(2) THE SPOUSE OR DEPENDENT OF AN ACTIVE DUTY MEMBER OF THE
UNIFORMED SERVICES WHO IS SERVING OVERSEAS IF THE SPOUSE OR DEPENDENT
LIVES OVERSEAS.
(D) EACH LOCAL BOARD SHALL VERIFY THE SIGNATURE OF THE VOTER ON
THE RETURN ENVELOPE OR BALLOT/RETURN ENVELOPE BY COMPARING THE
SIGNATURE WITH THE VOTER’S REGISTRATION RECORD IN ACCORDANCE WITH
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE STATE BOARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before the date that is
1 year after the date on which this Act becomes effective, each local board of elections shall
obtain technology capable of verifying the signature of a voter on the return envelope or
ballot/return envelope under § 9–310.1 of the Election Law Article as enacted by Section 1
of this Act.

HOUSE BILL 830
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.